Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1196.
do enact as follows:AB1196,11Section 1. 48.227 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 48.227 (1m) and 2amended to read:AB1196,2,10348.227 (1m) Nothing contained in this section prohibits a home licensed 4under s. 48.48 or 48.75 or a respite care provider home from providing housing and 5services to a runaway child with the consent of the child and the consent of the 6child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian, under the supervision of a county 7department, a child welfare agency, or the department. When the parent, 8guardian, or legal custodian and the child both consent to the provision of these 9services and the child has not been taken into custody, no hearing as described in 10this section is required.AB1196,211Section 2. 48.227 (1a) of the statutes is created to read:AB1196,2,161248.227 (1a) In this section, “respite care provider home” means the home of a 13person who has been approved in accordance with rules promulgated by the 14department under s. 48.67 to provide respite services or emergency care to a foster 15child during a foster parent’s absence by the department, a county department, or 16a child welfare agency licensed to place children in foster homes.AB1196,317Section 3. 48.227 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1196,3,71848.227 (2) Any person who operates a home under sub. (1) (1m) and licensed 19under s. 48.48 or 48.75 or a respite care provider home, when engaged in sheltering 20a runaway child without the consent of the child’s parent, guardian, or legal 1custodian, shall notify the intake worker of the presence of the child in the home 2within 12 hours. The intake worker shall notify the parent, guardian, and legal 3custodian as soon as possible of the child’s presence in that home. A hearing shall 4be held under sub. (4). The child shall not be removed from the home except with 5the approval of the court under sub. (4). This subsection does not prohibit the 6parent, guardian, or legal custodian from conferring with the child or the person 7operating the home.AB1196,48Section 4. 48.227 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1196,3,18948.227 (3) For runaway children who have been taken into custody and then 10released, the judge may, with the agreement of the persons operating the homes, 11designate homes licensed under ss. 48.48 and 48.75 or respite care provider homes 12as places for the temporary care and housing of such children. If the parent, 13guardian, or legal custodian refuses to consent, the person taking the child into 14custody or the intake worker may release the child to one of the homes designated 15under this section; however, a hearing shall be held under sub. (4). The child shall 16not be removed from the home except with the approval of the court under sub. (4). 17This subsection does not prohibit the parent, guardian, or legal custodian from 18conferring with the child or the person operating the home.AB1196,3,1919